Utah statutes.
17-18a-405.   Civil responsibilities of public prosecutors.

A public prosecutor may act as legal counsel to the state, county, government agency, or government entity regarding the following matters of civil law:

(1)  bail bond forfeiture actions;

(2)  actions for the forfeiture of property or contraband, as provided in Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act;

(3)  civil actions incidental to or appropriate to supplement a public prosecutor's duties, including an injunction, a habeas corpus, a declaratory action, or an extraordinary writ action, in which the interests of the state may be affected; and

(4)  any other civil duties related to criminal prosecution that are otherwise provided by statute.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

